Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Regional Planning Commission

§ 17-1-29.
Regional planning commissions; membership.

Any two or more counties and municipalities are hereby authorized and empowered to create and to establish a regional planning commission to be composed of representatives appointed thereto by each county board of supervisors and municipal legislative body desiring representation on such commission, and to appropriate monies from their respective public funds for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of Sections 17-1-31 through 17-1-35, inclusive. The regional planning commission shall be composed of not to exceed three representatives from each participating county and not to exceed two representatives from each participating municipality; provided, however, the regional planning commission membership shall not exceed fifteen in number. Participating governmental units may designate to membership ex officio and without vote the chairman of the local planning commission and/or the city or county engineer. Counties or municipalities within the State of Mississippi may join with adjacent counties, parishes, and/or municipalities in adjoining states to form an interstate regional planning commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964).

§ 17-1-31.
Term of office of members; filling of vacancies; compensation.

The term of office for the members appointed by the county board of supervisors shall be for a period of four years, and the term of office of the members appointed by the municipalities shall be for a term of three years. The method of filling vacancies shall be determined by the county board of supervisors and municipal legislative bodies, desiring representation on such commission. The members of such regional planning commission representing counties and municipalities shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 501, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964).

§ 17-1-33.
Regional planning commission to advise local municipalities and counties in planning matters.

The regional planning commission shall act in an advisory capacity to local municipalities and counties in interstate, regional, metropolitan, county and municipal planning matters involving the identification, discussion coordination and recommending solutions or a course of action in connection with problems including, but not limited to land use, water resources, mosquito control, highways, recreational areas, public schools, sewage and garbage disposal, public libraries, urban development, and other matters concerning the acquisition, planning, construction, development, financing, control, use, improvement and disposition of lands, buildings, structures, facilities, goods and services in the interest of public, or for public purposes involving the expenditures of public funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 501, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964).

§ 17-1-35.
Authority and powers of regional planning commissions.

Any regional planning commission created hereunder shall be authorized and empowered as follows:

To adopt rules or procedure for the regulations of its affairs, set forth policies and procedures for the conduct of its business, and to appoint, from among its members, a chairman and vice chairman, to serve annually, provided that such chairman may be subject to reelection.

To adopt an official name, seal, and retain and keep minutes of its meeting in a firmly bound minute book, in which all actions taken by the commission about its business shall so be recorded.

To meet at regular times on one day each and every month of the year.

To acquire, hold, maintain, lease, assign and convey real property, personal and mixed, as may be necessary or desirable for the purpose of maintaining the operations of the commission.

To employ and to compensate such personnel, consultants and technical and professional assistance as shall be necessary to exercise the powers and perform the duties set forth in Sections 17-1-31 through 17-1-35, inclusive.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under Sections 17-1-31 through 17-1-35, inclusive. The chairman of said regional commission shall be the duly authorized individual to execute contracts on behalf of said commission, upon duly and properly entered resolution of said commission so authorizing him to enter and execute said contract.

To hold public hearings and sponsor public forums in any part of the regional area whenever the commission deems it necessary or useful in the execution of its functions.

To accept and receive, in the furtherance of its functions, funds, grants and service from the federal government, or its agencies; from departments, agencies and instrumentalities of state, municipal or local government; or from private or civic sources.

To receive and expend such sums of money as shall be from time to time appropriated for its use by any county, state or municipality, and to receive and expend federal funds.

To cooperate in the exercise of its planning functions with federal and state agencies.

To be a body corporate and as such, may sue and be sued, in any suit against the commission, service of process shall be had by service upon the chairman with such process.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 501, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004.).